dev/numerals/numerals.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<num%>
%<percent%>
%<subst%>


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі


%<ord%>               ! 
%<coll%>              !

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%{A%}                     !
%{I%}                     ! 
%{E%}
%{N%}                     !
%{M%}                     !
%{D%}                     ! 
%{r%}                     ! 
%{s%}                     ! 
%{n%}                     ! 
%{l%}                     ! 
%{y%}                     ! 
%{ъ%}                     !
%{ң%}                     !
%{и%}                     ! deletes word-finally, for words like Минск / Минскиде
%{е%}                     ! for use in e.g. 1-ев, deletes in px3sp form, e.g. 1-вю

%{☭%}                     ! Russian noun (final voiced Cns treated as unvoiced)
%{❗%}



%{а%} 
%{э%} 
%{о%} 
%{ү%} 

%{й%}
%{л%}
%{н%}
%{з%}
%{т%}

%-
%,
%.
%%

LEXICON Root

Numerals ; 
LASTDIGIT ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!  C O P I E D    F R O M    K U M . L E X C 
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT 

# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP 

# ; 

LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}%{ң%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>г%{ъ%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-COP ; 
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-COP ; 

LEXICON CASES

%<nom%>: CLIT-COP ;
CASES-OBL ;

LEXICON POSS

CASES-ETC ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}нг CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{ъ%}%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{r%} CASES ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC

%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ки%{n%} CASES ; ! халкъныкинде
%<loc%>:%>д%{A%}г%{ъ%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESS-INFL

!%<attr%>: CLIT ; 
!%<advl%>: CLIT ; 
CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;

LEXICON ABESS

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з ABESS-INFL ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS ;
CASES-ETC ;
ABESS ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{r%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASES-OBL ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSS ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{r%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SQRD 

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ; 
³%<num%>:³ # ; 
%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-нч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{е%}в # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{е%}в # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{е%}в SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{н%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{н%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%} NUM ; ! "бир"
2:2%{э%} NUM ; ! "эки"
3:3%{ү%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "уьч"
4:4%{ү%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "дёрт"
5:5%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "беш"
6:6%{а%} NUM ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%} NUM ; ! "етти"
8:8%{э%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "сегиз"
9:9%{о%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "тогъуз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{о%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%} NUM ; ! "йигирма"
3%0:3%0%{о%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "отуз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "къыркъ"
5%0:5%0%{э%} NUM ; ! "элли"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "алтмыш"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "етмиш"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "токъсан"

LEXICON POWERS 
!%0:%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
%0%0:%0%0%{ү%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "юз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{э%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "минг"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ; 
%.:%. DIGITLEX ; 
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ; 
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ; 
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ; 
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ; 
%,:%, POWERS ; 
%.:%. POWERS ; 
      DIGITLEX ; 
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ; 
! <[%0 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> LASTDIGIT ; ! to avoid 212, 318 here

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ; 
1:1 LOOP ;
2:2 LOOP ;
3:3 LOOP ;
4:4 LOOP ;
5:5 LOOP ;
6:6 LOOP ;
7:7 LOOP ;
8:8 LOOP ;
9:9 LOOP ;

LEXICON Numerals

%0:%0 NUM ; 
№:№ DIGITLEX ; 
DIGITLEX ; 
LASTDIGIT ;
LASTDIGIT-REST ;
